North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-12 State Bar Association of North Dakota

27-12-01.
State bar association of North Dakota — How governed.

The state bar association of North Dakota shall operate under the constitution, bylaws, and rules adopted at the annual meeting of such association held in 1921 and amendments thereof duly adopted pursuant to the provisions of such constitution and bylaws.

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 25, §§ 1, 2; 1923, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; 1925 Supp., §§ 813a1, 813a2; R.C. 1943, § 27-1201.

27-12-02.
Membership of state bar association.

The membership of the state bar association of North Dakota consists of every person:

Who has secured an annual license to practice law in this state from the state board of law examiners in accordance with section 27-11-22; or

Who has an unrevoked certificate of admission to the bar of this state and who has paid an annual membership fee to the state bar association. The annual fee must be established by the state bar association at its annual meeting, by a majority vote of its members in attendance at the meeting, not to exceed eighty percent of the maximum fee for an annual license to practice law in this state as prescribed in section 27-11-22.

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 25, § 1; 1923, ch. 133, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 813a1; R.C. 1943, § 27-1202; S.L. 1965, ch. 222, § 1; 1971, ch. 305, § 2; 1977, ch. 267, § 3; 1987, ch. 379, § 1; 2001, ch. 286, § 18.

27-12-03.
Rights of members of bar association.

The members of the state bar association of North Dakota who have secured an annual license to practice law in this state are entitled to all of the rights and privileges of the association and are entitled to vote and to participate in all of the meetings thereof. The members of the association who have not secured an annual license to practice law in this state are entitled to all of the rights and privileges of the association, except that they are not entitled to vote at the meetings or to serve as an officer of the association.

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 25, § 1; 1923, ch. 133, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 813a1; R.C. 1943, § 27-1203; S.L. 1987, ch. 379, § 2.

27-12-04.
Moneys payable from state bar fund to state bar association.

The state bar association of North Dakota, out of the state bar fund, must receive for operation of the lawyer discipline system seventy-five dollars of each license fee beginning January 1, 1999. Eighty percent of the remaining amount of the annual license fees paid by licensed members must be paid to the state bar association for the purpose of administering and operating the association. These sums must be paid quarterly to the association by the state board of law examiners upon vouchers drawn in accordance with section 54-44-12.

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 25, § 2; 1923, ch. 133, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 813a2; S.L. 1933, ch. 143, § 1; 1939, ch. 111, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 27-1204; S.L. 1955, ch. 201, § 2; 1957, ch. 207, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 27-1204; S.L. 1963, ch. 239, § 1; 1969, ch. 286, § 1; 1971, ch. 510, § 3; 1997, ch. 31, § 14; 2001, ch. 286, § 19.

Collateral References.

Use of compulsory bar association dues or fees for activities from which particular members dissent, 40 A.L.R.4th 672.

27-12-05.
Bond of secretary-treasurer of bar association — Payment of premium.

The secretary-treasurer of the state bar association of North Dakota shall give a bond in the sum of two thousand dollars, and the premium therefor must be paid out of the amount paid to the said association from the state bar fund.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 133, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 813a4; R.C. 1943, § 27-1205.

27-12-06.
Method of expenditure of association’s funds — Annual report of receipts and disbursements.

Expenditures of funds from the state bar association special fund, which consists of all moneys or fees collected or received by the association and which is deposited or disbursed in accordance with section 54-44-12, must be approved by the president and executive director of said association. The secretary-treasurer of said association, in addition to the duties imposed by the constitution, bylaws, and rules of the association, annually shall file in the office of the secretary-treasurer of the state board of law examiners an itemized statement of the receipts and disbursements of said association.

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 25, § 3; 1923, ch. 133, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 813a3; R.C. 1943, § 27-1206; S.L. 1963, ch. 239, § 2; 1965, ch. 181, § 14; 1971, ch. 510, § 4; 2001, ch. 286, § 20.

Collateral References.

Use of compulsory bar association dues or fees for activities from which particular members dissent, 40 A.L.R.4th 672.

27-12-07.
No liability upon state created by provisions of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter do not create any liability on the part of the state of North Dakota in excess of the payment made, as hereinbefore provided, out of the state bar fund.

Source:

S.L. 1921, ch. 25, § 5; 1923, ch. 133, § 5; 1925 Supp., § 813a5; R.C. 1943, § 27-1207.

27-12-08.
Use of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 297, § 7.

27-12-09.
Confidential records.

Information provided to the state bar association regarding applicants or participants in a lawyer referral service or volunteer lawyer program administered by the state bar association is confidential.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 381, § 1.